Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 6A Criminal Justice Coordinating Council

Cross references.

Improvement of the criminal justice system, T. 28, C. 8.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 188), the General Assembly created the Governor’s Commission on Black on Black Crime and directed the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council to gather information regarding black on black crime and to report its findings to the commission.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 144.

35-6A-1.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that the high incidence of crime in Georgia is detrimental to the general welfare of the state and its citizens and that criminal justice efforts must be better coordinated, intensified, and made more effective in all components of the system and at all levels of government. The General Assembly, therefore, declares it to be the public policy of this state to provide the necessary leadership to coordinate the major components of the criminal justice system by establishing a state-wide coordinating body which represents all components and all levels of the criminal justice system.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 1.

35-6A-2.
Creation; assignment to Georgia Bureau of Investigation; definitions.

There is established the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council of the State of Georgia which is assigned to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

As used in this chapter, the term “council” means the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 311, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 1-5/SB 407; Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 15/SB 441.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (b), which read: “(b) As used in this chapter, the term:

“(1) ‘Board’ means the Criminal Case Data Exchange Board.

“(2) ‘Council’ means the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 1/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) The state’s current system for sharing criminal case data is not adequate to provide to all appropriately interested parties, including, but not limited to, law enforcement agencies and officers, courts, crime victims and other impacted individuals, housing providers, and employers, complete criminal case data;

“(2) One recent report indicates there may be as many as 7 million criminal charges without a final disposition indicated, and, of those, as many as 5.4 million criminal charges have languished for years;

“(3) Georgia’s citizens and businesses are harmed by incomplete criminal case data. For example, in thousands of cases, as a result of incomplete criminal case data, citizens’ employability and housing opportunities have been negatively impacted; and

“(4) A more uniform, modern system and framework for handling criminal case data will support the state in meeting its obligations to victims to keep them informed as their perpetrators make their way through the criminal justice system.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that criminal case data be complete and accurately reported to the appropriate state data base and be accessible to state and local criminal justice agencies, employers, housing providers, victims, and all citizens.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 2/SB 441, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Criminal Records Responsibility Act.’”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

35-6A-3.
Membership; vacancies; membership not bar to holding public office.

The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall consist of 27 members and shall be composed as follows:

The chairperson of the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, the director of homeland security, the chairperson of the Judicial Council of Georgia, the chairperson of the Council of Accountability Court Judges of Georgia, the chairperson of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia, the commissioner of corrections, the chairperson of the Board of Corrections, the commissioner of community supervision, the chairperson of the Board of Community Supervision, the vice chairperson of the Board of Public Safety, the chairperson of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, the State School Superintendent, the commissioner of community affairs, the president of the Council of Juvenile Court Judges, the chairperson of the Georgia Public Defender Council, the chairperson of the Governor’s Office for Children and Families, and the commissioner of juvenile justice or their designees shall be ex officio members of the council, as full voting members of the council by reason of their office; and

Ten members shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years, their initial appointments, however, being four for four-year terms, two for three-year terms, and four for two-year terms. Appointments shall be made so that there are always on the council the following persons: one county sheriff, one chief of police, one mayor, one county commissioner, one superior court judge, four individuals who shall be, by virtue of their training or experience, knowledgeable in the operations of the criminal justice system of this state, and one individual who shall be, by virtue of his or her training and experience, knowledgeable in the operations of the entire spectrum of crime victim assistance programs delivering services to victims of crime. No person shall serve beyond the time he or she holds the office or employment by reason of which he or she was initially eligible for appointment.

In the event of death, resignation, disqualification, or removal for any reason of any member of the council, vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment and successors shall serve for the unexpired term.

The initial terms for all 19 original members shall begin July 1, 1981. The initial term for the member added in 1985 shall begin July 1, 1985. The initial term for the member added in 1988 shall begin July 1, 1988. The initial term for the member added in 1989 shall begin July 1, 1989. The State School Superintendent shall be a member effective on July 1, 1989. The chairperson of the Georgia Public Defender Council shall become a member on December 31, 2003. The chairperson of the Council of Accountability Court Judges of Georgia shall become a member on July 1, 2015.

Membership on the council does not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 518, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 35; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 544, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 242, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 288, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1245, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 35; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 35; Ga. L. 1997, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 35; Ga. L. 2003, p. 191, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 988, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 11/HB 1054; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-55/HB 310; Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 8-8/HB 328; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 35/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “27 members” for “25 members” in subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, in paragraph (a)(1), “juvenile justice” was substituted for “the Department of Juvenile Justice ” and “and” was added at the end.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-3, in 2015, the amendment of the introductory language of subsection (a) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-55/HB 310, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2015, p. 519, § 8-8/HB 328, due to irreconcilable conflict.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 1/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act may be cited as the ‘Children and Family Services Strengthening Act of 2008.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 2/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that well-intentioned efforts over the years have resulted in the creation of several agencies focused on preventing child abuse and juvenile delinquency, on serving at-risk families and troubled youth, and on promoting the improvement of our state’s child welfare system. The General Assembly further finds that the work of some of these agencies overlaps, and that the at-risk families and troubled children of Georgia will be more efficiently and effectively served by consolidating the Children and Youth Coordinating Council with the Children’s Trust Fund Commission, by placing the functions of the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel under the supervision of the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children, and by encouraging these consolidated agencies to collaborate to create a consistent vision for serving the needs of our state’s families in need.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to sentences entered on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 21 (1992).

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 105 (2003).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

35-6A-4.
Election of chairperson and vice chairperson; meetings; minutes and records; rules.

The business of the council shall be conducted in the following manner:

The council shall annually elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from among its membership. The offices of chairperson and vice chairperson shall be filled in such a manner that they are not held in succeeding years by representatives of the same component (law enforcement, courts, corrections) of the criminal justice system;

The council shall meet at such times and places as it shall determine necessary or convenient to perform its duties. The council shall also meet on the call of the chairman or at the written request of three of its members;

The council shall maintain minutes of its meetings and such other records as it deems necessary;

The council shall adopt such rules for the transaction of its business as it shall desire and may appoint such committees as it considers necessary to carry out its business and duties, specifically including the power to transact and carry out through appointed committees the business of the council when serving pursuant to Chapter 15 of Title 17 as the Georgia Crime Victims Compensation Board.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 846, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 35/SB 465.

35-6A-5.
Compensation and expense allowance for members.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall receive for each day of actual attendance of council meetings a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 plus reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for use of a personal car in connection with such attendance.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 2010, p. 875, § 1/SB 173.

Cross references.

Expense allowance for members of General Assembly, § 45-7-4(a)(22).

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

35-6A-6.
Appointment of director; power and duties.

The Governor shall appoint a director of the council who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director may contract with other agencies, public and private, or persons as the director deems necessary for the rendering and affording of such services, facilities, studies, research, and reports to the council as will best assist it to carry out its duties and responsibilities.

The director may employ such other professional, technical, and clerical personnel as deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 6.

35-6A-7.
Functions and authority of council.

The council is vested with the following functions and authority:

To cooperate with and secure cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality in the state government or its political subdivisions in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter;

To prepare, publish in print or electronically, and disseminate fundamental criminal justice information of a descriptive and analytical nature to all components of the criminal justice system of this state, including law enforcement agencies, the courts, juvenile justice agencies, and correctional agencies;

To serve as the state-wide clearing-house for criminal justice information and research;

To maintain a research program in order to identify and define significant criminal justice problems and issues and effective solutions and to publish in print or electronically special reports as needed;

In coordination and cooperation with all components of the criminal justice system of this state, to develop criminal justice legislative proposals and executive policy proposals reflective of the priorities of the entire criminal justice system of this state;

To serve in an advisory capacity to the Governor on issues impacting the criminal justice system of this state;

To coordinate high visibility criminal justice research projects and studies which cross traditional system component lines with a state-wide impact;

To convene periodically state-wide criminal justice conferences involving key executives in the criminal justice system of this state and elected officials for the purpose of developing, prioritizing, and publicizing a policy agenda for the criminal justice system of this state;

To provide for the interaction, communication, and coordination of all components of the criminal justice system of this state for the purpose of improving this state’s response to crime and its effects;

To administer gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of carrying out this chapter;

To promulgate rules governing the approval of victim assistance programs as provided for in Article 8 of Chapter 21 of Title 15;

To supervise the preparation, administration, and implementation of the three-year juvenile justice plan as provided by this chapter; and

To do any and all things necessary and proper to enable it to perform wholly and adequately its duties and to exercise the authority granted to it.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 260, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 875, § 2/SB 173; Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 1/HB 263; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 35/HB 737.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 89 (1995).

For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).

35-6A-8.
Limitations on authority of council.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the council shall not exercise any power, undertake any duty, or perform any function assigned by law to the Governor, the Attorney General, or any of the prosecuting or investigatory agencies at the state or local level.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 8.

35-6A-9.
Preparation of budget requests; appropriations; gifts, grants, and donations of property and services.

The council shall prepare a budget request in the same manner as any such request would be prepared by a budget unit under Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act,” and a separate appropriation shall be provided for the council in the general appropriations Act.

The council shall be authorized to accept and use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The council shall also be authorized to accept and use property, both real and personal, and services, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any funds, property, or services received as gifts, grants, or donations shall be kept separate and apart from any funds received by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation; and such funds, property, or services so received as gifts, grants, or donations shall be the property and funds of the council and, as such, shall not lapse at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain under the control and subject to the direction of the council to carry out this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 9; Ga. L. 2010, p. 875, § 3/SB 173.

35-6A-10.
Incentives for using federal Department of Homeland Security’s Secure Communities initiative; obligations of council.

Subject to available funding, the council shall establish a grant or incentive program for the provision of funds to local law enforcement agencies as incentive to such agencies to use the federal Department of Homeland Security’s Secure Communities initiative or any successor or similar program and shall establish an incentive program and a grant program to offset the costs for local law enforcement agencies to enter into and implement memorandums of agreement with federal agencies under Section 287(g) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act. In awarding such grants or incentives, the council shall be authorized to consider and give priority to local areas with the highest crime rates for crimes committed by illegal aliens.

The council shall:

Subject to available funding, provide incentive programs and grants to local law enforcement agencies for utilizing federal resources and for entering into agreements with federal agencies for the enforcement of immigration law;

Provide technical assistance to local governments and agencies for obtaining and qualifying for incentive programs and grant funds to utilize available federal resources and to enter into and implement such agreements provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section;

Communicate information regarding the availability of federal resources and agreements provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section and the availability of related incentive programs and grant funds and post such information on the agency’s official Internet website;

Provide technical assistance and information regarding the process for contacting federal agencies, utilizing federal resources, and entering into agreements provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section and post such information on the agency’s official Internet website; and

Support state-wide campaigns and information programs in an effort to encourage every local law enforcement agency in this state to utilize federal resources and enter into agreements for the enforcement of state and federal immigration law.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 11/HB 87.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability, and provides, in part, that: “(b) The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c)
The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the enactment of this Code section shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

This Code section formerly pertained to the repeal of this chapter.
The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1981, p. 1306, § 11; and Ga. L. 1981 Ex. Sess., p. 8 and was repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 518, § 2, effective March 15, 1983.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 enactment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 35 (2011).

35-6A-11.
Advisory board created; membership.

There is established an advisory board to the council which shall consist of at least 15 and not more than 33 members appointed by the Governor who have training, experience, or special knowledge concerning the prevention and treatment of juvenile delinquency, the administration of juvenile justice, or the reduction of juvenile delinquency and shall be composed of:

At least three members of the council, two of whom are not full-time government employees or elected officials;

At least one locally elected official representing general purpose local government;

Representatives of law enforcement and juvenile justice agencies, including juvenile and family court judges, prosecuting attorneys, attorneys for children and youth, and probation workers;

Representatives of public agencies concerned with delinquency prevention or treatment, such as welfare, social services, mental health, education, special education, recreation, and youth services;

Representatives of private nonprofit organizations, including individuals with a special focus on preserving and strengthening families, parent groups and parent self-help groups, youth development, delinquency prevention and treatment, neglected or dependent children, the quality of juvenile justice, education, and social services for children;

Volunteers who work with delinquent children or potential delinquent children;

Representatives of programs that are alternatives to incarceration, including programs providing organized recreation activities;

Individuals with special experience and competence in addressing problems related to school violence and vandalism and alternatives to suspension and expulsion; and

Persons, licensed or certified by the applicable state, with expertise and competence in preventing and addressing mental health and substance abuse issues in delinquent youth and youth at risk of delinquency; and

Representatives of victim or witness advocacy groups, including at least one individual with expertise in addressing the challenges of sexual abuse and exploitation and trauma, particularly the needs of youth who experience disproportionate levels of sexual abuse, exploitation, and trauma before entering the juvenile justice system.

A majority of the members of the advisory board, including the chairperson, shall not be full-time employees of the federal, state, or local government.

At least one-fifth of the members of the advisory board shall be under 28 years of age at the time of their appointment.

At least three members shall have been or shall currently be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system of this state or, if not feasible and in appropriate circumstances, shall be a parent or guardian of a person who has been or is currently under the jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system.

Membership on the advisory board shall not constitute public office and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

The advisory board shall elect a chairperson from among its membership who must also be a member of the council. The advisory board may elect such other officers and committees as it considers appropriate.

Members of the advisory board shall serve without compensation, although each member of the advisory board shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties from funds available to the office. Such reimbursement shall be limited to all travel and other expenses necessarily incurred through service on the advisory board, in compliance with this state’s travel rules and regulations. However, in no case shall a member of the advisory board be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the member’s capacity as the representative of another state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 2/HB 263; Ga. L. 2022, p. 365, § 1/HB 1433.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “Representatives of” for “Youth workers involved with” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(7), rewrote paragraph (a)(9), which read: “Individuals with special experience and competence in addressing problems related to learning disabilities, emotional difficulties, child abuse and neglect, and youth violence.”, added paragraph (a)(10); substituted “28 years” for “24 years” in paragraph (b)(2), and added “or, if not feasible and in appropriate circumstances, shall be a parent or guardian of a person who has been or is currently under the jurisdiction of the juvenile justice system” at the end of paragraph (b)(3).

35-6A-12.
Role of the advisory board.

The advisory board shall:

Meet at such times and places as it shall determine necessary or convenient to perform its duties. The advisory board shall also meet on the call of the chairperson, the director of the council, the chairperson of the council, or the Governor;

Maintain minutes of its meetings;

Participate in the development and review of this state’s juvenile justice plan prior to submission to the council for final action;

Be afforded the opportunity to review and comment, not later than 30 days after their submission to the advisory board, on all juvenile justice and delinquency prevention grant applications submitted to the council;

Using the combined expertise and experience of its members, provide regular advice and counsel to the director of the council to enable the council to carry out its statutory duties under this article; and

Carry out such duties that may be required by federal law or regulation so as to enable this state to receive and disburse federal funds for juvenile delinquency prevention and treatment.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 2/HB 263.

35-6A-13.
[Repealed] Criminal Case Data Exchange Board; membership; operation.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 1-6/SB 407; repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 16/SB 441, effective July 1, 2022.

35-6A-14.
[Repealed] Role of board; public access.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 1-6/SB 407; repealed by Ga. L. 2022, p. 121, § 16/SB 441, effective July 1, 2022.

35-6A-15.
Grant program for recovery of transportation costs to emergency treatment facilities.

Subject to appropriations, the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall establish a grant program for the provision of funds to units of local government to be used for costs associated with transporting individuals to and from emergency receiving, evaluating, and treatment facilities as such terms are defined in Chapters 3 and 7 of Title 37.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6A-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-6/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.